Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 3 Conditions of Detention Generally
42-5-56.
Visitation with minors by convicted sexual offenders.

As used in this Code section, the term “sexual offense” means a violation of Code Section 16-6-1, relating to the offense of rape; Code Section 16-6-2, relating to the offenses of sodomy and aggravated sodomy; Code Section 16-6-5.1, relating to the offense of improper sexual contact by employee or agent, improper sexual contact by a foster parent, and improper sexual contact by person in a position of trust; Code Section 16-6-22, relating to the offense of incest; or Code Section 16-6-22.2, relating to the offense of aggravated sexual battery, when the victim was under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of any such offense; or a violation of Code Section 16-6-3, relating to the offense of statutory rape; Code Section 16-6-4, relating to the offenses of child molestation and aggravated child molestation; or Code Section 16-6-5, relating to the offense of enticing a child for indecent purposes, when the victim was under 16 years of age at the time of the commission of any such offense.

Any inmate with a current or prior conviction for any sexual offense as defined in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be allowed visitation with any person under the age of 18 years unless such person is the spouse, son, daughter, brother, sister, grandson, or granddaughter of the inmate and such person is not the victim of a sexual offense for which the inmate was convicted. If visitation with a minor is restricted by court order, permission for special visitation with the minor may be granted only by the court issuing such order.

History.

Code 1971, §

42-5-56

, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 591, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 912, § 6/SB 9; Ga. L. 2020, p. 245, § 3/HB 911; Ga. L. 2021, p. 516, § 5/SB 117.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “improper sexual contact by employee or agent” for “sexual assault against a person in custody” in the middle of subsection (a).

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “and improper sexual contact by a foster parent” in the middle of subsection (a).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “agent, improper sexual contact by a foster parent, and improper sexual contact by person in a position of trust” for “agent and improper sexual contact by a foster parent” in the middle of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

The former provisions of this Code section, concerning temporary transfer of convicted persons pending appeal and adoption of rules and regulations by the board, were based on Ga. L. 1971, p. 341, § 4, and were repealed by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1364, § 3, effective January 1, 1983.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Visitation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Board of Corrections, Institutional and Center Operations, Chapter 125-3-4.

42-5-57.
Institution of rehabilitation programs; provision of opportunities for educational, religious, and recreational activities.

The board, acting alone or in cooperation with the Department of Education, the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, or the several state, local, and federal agencies concerned therewith shall be authorized to institute a program of rehabilitation, which may include academic, industrial, mechanical, agricultural, and vocational training, within the confines of a penal institution.

The board, acting alone or in cooperation with the Georgia Firefighter Standards and Training Council, shall be authorized to institute a program of rehabilitation which includes training following the Georgia Fire Academy curriculum within the confines of a penal institution.

The board, acting alone or in cooperation with the Department of Public Health, shall be authorized to institute a program of rehabilitation which includes training for emergency medical services personnel as such term is defined in Code Section 31-11-49 within the confines of a penal institution.

The department, in institutions under its control and supervision, shall give the inmates opportunity for reasonable educational, religious, and recreational activities where practicable.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 23; Ga. L. 1964, p. 734, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1399, § 4; Ga. L. 2021, p. 782, § 9/SB 46.

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, added subsections (b) and (c), and redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (d).

42-5-58.
Prohibition against corporal punishment; use of handcuffs, leg chains, and other restraints; permissible punishment generally.

Whipping of inmates and all forms of corporal punishment shall be prohibited. All shackles, manacles, picks, leg irons, and chains shall be barred from use as punishment by any penal institution operated under authority of the board. In transferring violent or potentially dangerous inmates within an institution or between facilities, handcuffs, leg chains, waist chains, and waist belts may be utilized. Handcuffs, leg chains, waist chains, and waist belts may also be used in securing violent or potentially dangerous inmates within an institution and in public and private areas such as hospitals and clinics; but in no event may handcuffs, leg chains, waist chains, and waist belts be used as punishment; provided, however, if the accused becomes violent in the courtroom, restraints may be used.

The department shall restrict punishment for an infraction of correctional rules and regulations to isolation and restricted diet or to uniform standard humane punishment which the department may deem necessary for the control of inmates.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 15; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1806, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 42; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 42.

Cross references.

Cruel and unusual punishment, U.S. Const., amend. 8 and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XVII.

Prohibition against whipping as punishment for crimes, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XXI.

Penalty for assault by state officer under color of office or commission, § 45-11-3.

Law reviews.

For note, “Behind Closed Doors: An Empirical Inquiry Into the Nature of Prison Discipline in Georgia,” see 8 Ga. L. Rev. 919 (1974).

42-5-59.
Employment of inmates in the local community.

The commissioner shall extend the limits of the place of confinement of an inmate, if there is reasonable cause to believe the inmate will honor his trust, by authorizing the inmate, under prescribed conditions, to work at paid employment or participate in a training program in the community on a voluntary basis while continuing as an inmate of the institution to which he is committed, provided that:

Representatives of local union central bodies or similar labor union organizations are consulted;

The paid employment will not result in the displacement of employed workers, be applied in skills, crafts, or trades in which there is a surplus of available gainful labor in the locality, or impair existing contracts for services; and

The rates of pay and other conditions of employment will not be less than those paid or provided for work of a similar nature in the locality in which the work is to be performed.

An inmate authorized to work at paid employment in the community under subsection (a) of this Code section shall comply with all rules and regulations promulgated by the board relative to the handling, disbursement, and holding in trust of all funds earned by the inmate while under the jurisdiction of the department. An amount determined to be the cost of the inmate’s keep and confinement shall be deducted from the earnings of each inmate, and such amount shall be deposited in the treasury of the department; provided, however, that, if the inmate is assigned to a county correctional institution, the deducted amount shall be deposited in the treasury of the county to which the inmate is assigned. After the deduction for keep and confinement, the commissioner shall:

Allow the inmate to draw from the balance a reasonable sum to cover his incidental expenses;

Retain to the inmate’s credit an amount as is deemed necessary to accumulate a reasonable sum to be paid to him on his release from the penal institution;

Deduct from the inmate’s funds any amounts necessary to cover the costs of medical or dental attention provided to the inmate, said deductions to be made in accordance with policies and procedures promulgated by the commissioner; and

Cause to be paid any additional balance as is needed for the support of the inmate’s dependents.

No inmate employed in the community under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be deemed to be an agent, employee, or involuntary servant of the department while working in the community or going to and from his employment.

The willful failure of an inmate to remain within the extended limits of his confinement or to return within the time prescribed to an institution designated by the commissioner shall be deemed an escape from a penal institution and shall be punishable by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 13; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1399, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 602, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 435, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1299, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1596, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 42.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on workers’ compensation, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 399 (2009).

42-5-60.
Hiring out of inmates; participation of inmates in programs of volunteer service; sale of products produced by inmates; disposition of proceeds; payment to inmates for services.

The board shall provide rules and regulations governing the hiring out of inmates by any penal institution under its authority to municipalities, cities, the Department of Transportation, and any other political subdivision, public authority, public corporation, agency, or state or local government, which entities are authorized by this subsection to contract for and receive the inmates. Such inmates shall not be hired out to private persons or corporations, nor shall any instrumentality of government authorized by this subsection to utilize penal labor use such labor in any business conducted for profit, except as provided in Code Section 42-5-59; provided, however, that:

Inmate trainees enrolled in any vocational, technical, or educational training program authorized and supported by the department may repair or otherwise utilize any privately owned property or equipment as well as any other property or equipment in connection with the activities of any such training program, so long as the repair or utilization contributes to the inmate’s acquisition of any desired vocational, technical, or educational skills; and

To the extent authorized by the rules and regulations of the board, inmates may be allowed to participate in programs of volunteer service as authorized by this subparagraph. The rules and regulations of the board shall prescribe criteria for nonprofit organizations eligible to receive volunteer services. Such criteria shall require that any participating nonprofit organization be qualified as exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and shall give consideration in determining eligibility to the nonprofit organization’s history of service activities and the length of time for which it has been in existence and providing such services. Any such volunteer service program shall include elements whereby the volunteer inmates provide services of benefit to the community while receiving training or work experience suitable for their rehabilitation. The board may authorize such voluntary inmate participation, notwithstanding the fact that the nonprofit organization may receive direct or indirect payment as a result of such inmate participation; notwithstanding the fact that the services rendered may provide some degree of benefit to private individuals or organizations or both; and notwithstanding the fact that some inmate participation may take place outside the confines of a penal institution.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subsection, any private person, organization, or corporation with whom the commissioner has contracted for the land acquisition, design, construction, operation, maintenance, use, lease, or management of a state prison or for any services related to the custody, care, and control of inmates as authorized by Code Section 42-2-8 may utilize penal labor in the same manner as any such labor may be utilized by any other penal institution operated under the authority of the board. Agreements made pursuant to Code Section 42-2-8 for the land acquisition, design, construction, operation, maintenance, use, lease, or management of a state prison or for any services related to the care, custody, and control of inmates shall factor the value of penal labor such that the state is the only financial beneficiary of the same.

No goods, wares, or merchandise which have been manufactured, produced, or mined, wholly or in part, by the inmates of any state or county correctional institution operated under the jurisdiction of the board shall be sold in this state to any private person, firm, association, or corporation, except that this prohibition shall not apply to:

Sales to private colleges and universities;

A sale to a private contractor of goods, wares, or merchandise for use in the completion of a publicly funded project; or

Sales to privately owned correctional facilities that house inmates from the State of Georgia.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to forbid the sale of such goods or merchandise to other political subdivisions, public authorities, municipalities, or agencies of the state or local governments to be consumed by them or to agencies of the state to be in turn sold by the agency to the public in the performance of the agency’s duties as required by law. This subsection does not prohibit the sale of unprocessed agricultural products produced on state property.

Funds arising from the sale of goods or other products manufactured or produced by any state correctional institution operated by the department shall be deposited with the treasury of the department. The funds arising from the sale of goods and products produced in a county correctional institution or from the hiring out of inmates shall be placed in the treasury or depository of the county, as the case may be. The department is authorized, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board, to pay compensation of not more than $25.00 per month from funds available to the department to each inmate employed in any industry.

Any superintendent, warden, guard, official, or other person who violates this Code section or any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, relating to the sale of goods or products manufactured or produced in a correctional institution or the hiring out of inmates, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

The department or any state correctional institution or county correctional institution operating under jurisdiction of the board shall be authorized to require inmates coming into its custody to labor on the public roads or public works or in such other manner as the board may deem advisable, including without limitation any labor authorized under Chapter 15A of Title 17. The department may also contract with municipalities, cities, counties, the Department of Transportation, or any other political subdivision, public authority, public corporation, or agency of state or local government created by law, which entities are authorized by this Code section to contract with the department, for the construction, repair, or maintenance of roads, bridges, public buildings, and any other public works by use of penal labor.

Any provision of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any inmate of any state or county correctional institution operated under the jurisdiction of the board may sell goods, wares, and merchandise created by such inmate through the pursuit of a hobby or recreational activity. The proceeds from the sales shall be distributed to the particular inmate who created the goods, wares, or merchandise. The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations governing the sale of such goods, wares, and merchandise and the distribution of the proceeds from the sales. All goods, wares, and merchandise created by an inmate must be sold within the institution or on the institution grounds during visiting hours or when on off-duty assignments.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 22; Ga. L. 1957, p. 477, § 4; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1092, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1399, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 577, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 651, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 42; Ga. L. 1993, p. 629, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 851, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1584, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1090, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 252, § 4.

Cross references.

Hiring out of inmates for public road projects, §§

32-4-42

,

32-4-91

.

Correctional Industries, T. 42, C. 10.

Use of inmate labor to abate hazard presented by abandoned well or hole, §

44-1-14

.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 230 (1997).

42-5-60.1.
Utilization of inmates of county correctional institutions for work on outdoor assignments during inclement weather; supervision of inmates.

As used in this Code section, the term “inclement weather” means weather in which there is rain or in which the temperature is below 28 degrees Fahrenheit.

Inmates of a county correctional institution who are otherwise required to work on outdoor assignments shall work on such assignments notwithstanding inclement weather if employees of any governmental entity within the county in which the work is to be performed are performing outdoor work during such inclement weather and such work is similar in kind or in degree of exertion to that to be performed by the inmates.

Correctional officers and other supervisory personnel shall be available to supervise adequately those inmates performing outdoor work in inclement weather.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1421, § 1.

42-5-61.
Services and benefits to be furnished inmates discharged by department or county correctional institutions.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, whenever an inmate is discharged upon pardon or completion of his sentence or is conditionally released or paroled from any place of detention to which he has been assigned under the authority of the department, the department shall provide the inmate the following:

Transportation to the inmate’s home within the United States or to a place chosen by the inmate and authorized by regulations of the board;

An amount of money of not less than $25.00 and not more than $150.00, as determined according to regulations of the board; and

A travel kit, when appropriate, and suitable clothing, each as provided by regulation of the board.

Whenever an inmate assigned to a county correctional institution by the department is discharged upon pardon or completion of his sentence or is conditionally released or paroled, the county shall provide the inmate the release benefits to which he is eligible under this Code section, and the department shall reimburse the county.

An inmate whose limits of confinement have been extended to allow him to participate in a work-release program of paid employment shall receive the benefits provided by this Code section only to the extent of financial need, as determined pursuant to regulations of the board.

An inmate convicted of an offense which is less than a felony shall receive the amount of $25.00 or less as determined under regulations of the board and transportation as provided in this Code section.

The department shall administer these benefits through regulations which are based upon the knowledge and skill of the board in aiding an inmate to make the initial adjustment to his release.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 21; Ga. L. 1969, p. 600, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 602, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 542, § 1.

42-5-62.
Forfeiture of contraband.

The possession by an inmate on his person or in his cell, immediate sleeping area, locker, or immediate place of work or assignment of any form of securities, bonds, coins, currency, or legal tender, unless expressly and specifically authorized by the individual institution concerned, shall constitute contraband and be subject to forfeiture. With respect to state correctional institutions, all such securities, bonds, coins, currency, or legal tender shall vest in the state and shall be paid into the state treasury. With respect to county correctional institutions, all such currency and other items shall vest in the county and shall be paid into the county treasury.

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 1095, § 1.

42-5-63.
Unauthorized possession of weapon by inmate.

Every person confined in a penal institution or confined in any other facility under the jurisdiction of or subject to the authority of the board or who, while being conveyed to or from any facility, or while at any other location under such jurisdiction or authority, or while being conveyed to or from any such place, or while under the custody of officials, officers, or employees subject to such jurisdiction or authority, who, without authorization of the appropriate authorities, possesses or carries upon his person or has under his custody or control any instrument or weapon of the kind commonly known as a blackjack, slingshot, billy, sandclub, sandbag, or knuckles whether made from metal, thermoplastic, wood, or other similar material; or any pistol, revolver, or other firearm; or any explosive substance; or any dirk, dagger, switchblade, gravity knife, razor, or any other sharp instrument which is capable of such use as may endanger the safety or security of any of the facilities described in this subsection or of any person therein shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for a term of not less than one nor more than five years.

A person is deemed “confined in a penal institution” if he is confined in any of the penal institutions specified in subsection (a) of this Code section by order made pursuant to law, regardless of the purpose of the confinement and regardless of the validity of the order directing the confinement, until a judgment of a competent court setting aside the order becomes final so as to entitle the person to his immediate release.

A person is deemed “confined in” a penal institution even if, at the time of the offense, he is temporarily outside its walls or bounds for the purpose of confinement in a local place of confinement pending trial or for any other purpose for which an inmate may be allowed temporarily outside the walls or bounds of a penal institution; but an inmate who has been released on parole is not deemed “confined in” a penal institution for purposes of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 555, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 42; Ga. L. 2008, p. 533, § 3/SB 366.

Cross references.

Penalty for possession of firearms by convicted felons, §

16-11-131

.

42-5-64.
Educational programming.

The commissioner shall maintain an educational program within the state prison system to assist inmates in achieving at least a fifth-grade level on standardized reading tests. Inmates who test below the fifth-grade level and who have been sentenced to incarceration for a period of one year or longer shall be required by institutional staff to attend appropriate classes until they attain this level or until they are released from incarceration, whichever event occurs first; provided, however, that inmates who have remained in the educational program for 90 school days may voluntarily withdraw thereafter. The commissioner or his designee shall have the discretion to exclude certain inmates from the provisions of this subsection due to the inability of such inmates to benefit from an educational program for reasons which may include: custody status, particularly of those inmates under a death sentence; mental handicap or physical illness; participation in a boot camp program; or possession of a general education diploma or high school diploma. The State Board of Pardons and Paroles shall incorporate satisfactory participation in such an educational program into the parole guidelines adopted pursuant to Code Section 42-9-40.

For the purposes of this Code section, educational programming shall not apply to inmates who:

Have been sentenced to death;

Have attained 50 years of age; or

Have serious learning disabilities.

The commissioner shall provide additional educational programs in which inmates can voluntarily participate to further their education beyond the fifth-grade level.

The commissioner shall utilize available services and programs within the Department of Education, and the Department of Education shall cooperate with the commissioner in the establishment of educational programs and the testing of inmates as required in this Code section.

The commissioner shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1596, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3219, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “programming” was substituted for “programing” in subsection (b).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, in subsection (a) as amended by Ga. L. 1992, p. 3219, § 1, “Paroles” was substituted for “Parole” in the fourth sentence of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 3219, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective only when funds are specifically appropriated for purposes of this Act in an appropriations Act making specific reference to this Act. This Act shall apply to those inmates sentenced to the Department of Corrections after its effective date.” Funds were appropriated by the General Assembly at the 1993 session.

42-5-65.
Victim photographs prohibited; exception.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “inmate” means any person confined in a penal institution or confined in another facility under the jurisdiction of or subject to the authority of the board or while under the custody of officials, officers, or employees under the authority of the board.

An inmate who is serving a sentence for a violation of Chapter 5 of Title 16 relating to crimes against the person shall be prohibited from possessing or carrying about his or her person or maintaining in any prison cell or similar area under his or her control any photograph, picture, or similar depiction of any victim of the offense for which he or she is serving where such photograph, picture, or depiction was a part of the criminal investigation, prosecution, or evidence leading to the inmate’s conviction.

An inmate who is serving a sentence for a violation of Chapter 6 of Title 16 relating to sexual offenses shall be prohibited from possessing or carrying about his or her person or maintaining in any prison cell or similar area under his or her control any photograph, picture, or similar depiction of any victim of the offense for which he or she is serving.

A person acting in violation of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

This Code section shall not apply where the photograph or picture is needed for use in any civil or criminal proceeding provided that the inmate receives permission by a court having jurisdiction over the proceeding and only for so long as and in such manner as directed by court order.

Nothing in this Code section shall limit further restrictions or limitations on the possession of contraband or victim photographs by persons confined or under the custody of the board as deemed appropriate by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-5-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 169, § 1/SB 34; enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 224, § 2/HB 313.

Code Commission notes.

The enactment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2007, p. 169, § 1, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2007, p. 224, § 2. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921).